Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202615-255
Public safety; measures to protect.

A city of the primary class may (1) prohibit riots, routs, noise, or disorderly assemblies, (2) prevent the discharge of firearms, rockets, powder, fireworks, or other dangerous and combustible material, (3) regulate and prevent the transportation of gunpowder or combustible articles, tar, pitch, resin, coal oil, benzine, turpentine, hemp, cotton, nitroglycerine, dynamite, petroleum or its products, or other explosives or inflammables, (4) regulate use of lights in stables, shops, or other places and building of bonfires, and (5) regulate and prohibit the piling of building material or any excavation or obstruction of the streets.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LV, p. 141;

R.S.1913, § 4465;

C.S.1922, § 3850;

C.S.1929, § 15-253;

R.S.1943, § 15-255;

Laws 2009, LB430, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 66;

Laws 2023, LB77, § 3.